apertium-tur-uzb.tur.lexc
LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!       N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Clitics 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT

%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} PERS3 ; 
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.

LEXICON CLIT-NOPERS

%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} # ; 
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.

! LEXICON COPULA-LOCATIVE 

!this is the copula which can go after nouns in locative cases and after adjectives. "to be in sometihng" "to be something"

! %<cop%>%<pres%>: PERS-COP-PRES ; 


LEXICON V-PERS-COP

%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>:%>{D%}%{I%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON V-NOPERS-COP

%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>:%>{D%}%{I%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL    ! Includes personal copula suffixes, therefore appears only
                        ! after nominal parts of speech (and only after some cases).
                        ! FIXME: to be checked whether leads to any overgeneration
CLIT ;
V-PERS-COP ;

LEXICON CLIT-NOPERS

CLIT-NOPERS ;
V-NOPERS-COP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Personal suffixes
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!! FIXME: Move from VERBS here.


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ATTR ! Adjective inflection

CLIT ;
# ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}n CLIT ;      
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<ins%>:%>%{y%}l%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;     

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC-NONOM

%<px%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}ki%{pN%} CASE-NONOM ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;

CASE-NONOM ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
GENPOSS-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;
!ABE-ETC ;
 
LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;               
%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}n CLIT ;      
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<ins%>:%>%{y%}l%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}k%{I%} CLIT-GENERAL ; 

!!!! POSSESSIVES

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

%<px%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}ki%{pN%} CASE ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;

CASE ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
  
LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{pN%} CASE-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{pN%} CASE-ETC ;  

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;
!ABE-ETC ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Noun paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1 ! Generic noun paradigm.
           ! e.g. ev, kitap, ...

%<n%>: SUBST ; 
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;  
%<n%>%<abe%>:%>s%{I%}z # ;
%<n%>%<abe%>%<subst%>:%>s%{I%}z SUBST ;

LEXICON N2 ! Compound nouns with compulsory possession. 
           ! e.g. dikiş makinası, dikiş makinaları, ...

%<n%>: POSS-REAL ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSS-REAL ; 

LEXICON N3 ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
           ! e.g. turk, turkçe

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON N4 ! Nouns with usage as postpositions. 
           ! We separate these in case they have some different morphotactics.
           ! e.g. arka: arkasına, iç: içinde

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;

! LEXICON N6 ! Languages which aren't nationalities
           ! e.g. 

! %<n%>: SUBST ; 
! %<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
! %<n%>%<advl%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NP1-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
! %<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP2-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{pN%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP3-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{pN%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP4-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON NP1-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP2-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{pN%} N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON NP1-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP1-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP1-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>: # ;



LEXICON NP1-AL

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nun CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:na CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:nu CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:nuki%{pN%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:ndaki ATTR-SUBST ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<com%>:nunla # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:nu%{pN%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:nlar CASE-ETC ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:nları%{pN%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NERE

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:%>nin # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:%>ye #  ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:%>yi # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:%>den # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>de # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px%>:%>si CASE ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>deki ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG 

ne:ne PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
neyi:neyi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
niye:niye PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
kim:kim PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"
hangi:hangi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "which"

nere:nere PRON-ITG-NERE ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASE-ETC ;
%<adv%>:ç%{A%} CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:bende CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<px%>:benimki CASE ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:bendeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:senin CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:senden CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<px%>:seninki CASE ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sendeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:bize CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<px%>:bizimki CASE ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:bizce CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizi CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<px%>:sizinki CASE ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:onlar CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:onlarda CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<px%>:onlarınki CASE ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:onlardeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
LEXICON Nouns
Şubat:Şubat N5 ; ! "February"
Mart:Mart N5 ; ! "March"
Nisan:Nisan N5 ; ! "April"
Mayıs:Mayıs N5 ; ! "May"
Haziran:Haziran N5 ; ! "June"
Temmuz:Temmuz N5 ; ! "July"
Eylül:Eylül N5 ; ! "September"
Kasım:Kasım N5 ; ! "November"
aşağı:aşağı N1 ; ! "hedge"
çakşır:çakşır N1 ; ! "leg feather"
ejderha:ejderha N1 ; ! "dragon"
gramofon:gramofon N1 ; ! "gramophone"
hu:hu N1 ; ! "hey"
izzetinefis:izzetinefis N1 ; ! "pride"
mağlubiyet:mağlubiyet N1 ; ! "defeat"
yıldönüm:yıldönüm N2 ; ! "anniversary"
ay% ışığı:ay% ışık N2 ; ! "moon beam"
dikiş% makinası:dikiş% makina N2 ; ! "sewing machine"
el% kızı:el% kız N2 ; ! "strange woman"
mal% varlığı:mal% varlık N2 ; ! "property"
su% topu:su% top N2 ; ! "water polo"
yurt% dışı:yurt% dış N2 ; ! "abroad"
demiryol:demiryol N2 ; ! "railway"
euro:euro N1 ; ! "euro"
iç:iç N4 ; ! "inside"
yüz:yüz N4 ; ! "face"
geri:geri N4 ; ! "back"
ara:ara N4 ; ! "space"
taraf:taraf N4 ; ! ""
üst:üst N4 ; ! ""
karşı:karşı N4 ; ! "front"
ön:ön N4 ; !
Bulgar:Bulgar N3 ; ! ""
Romen:Romen N3 ; ! ""
İngiliz:İngiliz N3 ; ! ""
İtalyan:İtalyan N3 ; ! ""
Rum:Rum N3 ; ! "Greek"
Sloven:Sloven N3 ; ! ""
Özbek:Özbek N3 ; ! "Uzbek"
Alman:Alman N3 ; ! "German"
Roman:Roman N3 ; ! "roman"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Barbados:Barbados NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Craiova:Craiova NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Guatemala:Guatemala NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Katowice:Katowice NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Neum:Neum NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Taipei:Taipei NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Sivas:Sivas NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Adriyatik% Denizi:Adriyatik% Denizi NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Hazar% Denizi:Hazar% Denizi NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Baltık% Denizi:Baltık% Denizi NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Maya% halkları:Maya% halkları NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Çek% Cumhuriyeti:Çek% Cumhuriyeti NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Erdel% Prensliği:Erdel% Prensliği NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Rusya% Sovyet% Federatif% Sosyalist% Cumhuriyeti:Rusya% Sovyet% Federatif% Sosyalist% Cumhuriyeti NP2-TOP ; ! ""
Amerika% Birleşik% Devletleri:Amerika% Birleşik% Devletleri NP3-TOP ; ! ""
Sovyet% Sosyalist% Cumhuriyetler% Birliği:Sovyet% Sosyalist% Cumhuriyetler% Birliği NP3-TOP ; ! ""
Balkanlar:Balkanlar NP4-TOP ; ! ""
Deutsche% Telekom:Deutsche% Telekom NP1-ORG ; ! ""
HSBC:HSBC NP1-ORG ; ! ""
SE:SE NP1-ORG ; ! ""
GERB:GERB NP1-AL ; ! ""
International:International NP1-AL ; ! ""
Radikal% Sol% Koalisyonu:Radikal% Sol% Koalisyonu NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Sırp% Ordusu:Sırp% Ordusu NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Sırbistan% Parlamentosu:Sırbistan% Parlamentosu NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Avrupa% Parlamentosu:Avrupa% Parlamentosu NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Avrupa% Komisyonu:Avrupa% Komisyonu NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Sırp% Sosyalist% Partisi:Sırp% Sosyalist% Partisi NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Sosyalist% Partisi:Sosyalist% Partisi NP2-ORG ; ! ""
Antalyaspor:Antalyaspor NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Vefa:Vefa NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Hacettepe:Hacettepe NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Deportivo% La% Coruña:Deportivo% La% Coruña NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Southeast% European% Times:Southeast% European% Times NP1-AL ; ! ""
EUobserver:EUobserver NP1-AL ; ! ""
Dnevnik:Dnevnik NP1-AL ; ! ""
G17% Plus:G17% Plus NP1-AL ; ! ""
Europe:Europe NP1-AL ; ! ""
Anton:Anton NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Clark:Clark NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Dusko:Dusko NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Hizbullah:Hizbullah NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Michel:Michel NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Rauf:Rauf NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Yves:Yves NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Maria:Maria NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Carla:Carla NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Laura:Laura NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Natasa:Natasa NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Bojana:Bojana NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Marija:Marija NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Biljana:Biljana NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Blagoyeviç:Blagoyeviç NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Boskiç:Boskiç NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Kosiç:Kosiç NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Rüstempasiç:Rüstempasiç NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Nelson:Nelson NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Zivkoviç:Zivkoviç NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
Karamanlis:Karamanlis NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
